Arkansas, session 2025, SB83.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 29 — Coverage for Breast Reconstruction Surgery

23-79-2901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Ambulatory surgery center" means an entity certified by:
(A) Medicare as an ambulatory surgical center that
operates for the purpose of providing surgical services to patients and that
is eligible to receive reimbursement from Medicaid for ambulatory surgery
*ANS056*
03-19-2025 14:21:43 ANS056

As Engrossed: S3/4/25 S3/19/25 SB83
services;
(B) The Joint Commission, an entity for the accreditation
of healthcare organizations;
(C) The Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health
Care; or
(D) The American Association for Accreditation of
Ambulatory Surgery Facilities;
(2)(A) "Breast reconstruction surgery" means all stages of
surgery to repair physical defects caused by the extirpation or medical
treatment of diseased breast tissue and all stages of surgery to reconstruct
a breast mound or to create a new breast mound and to reestablish symmetry
between two (2) breasts:
(i) Following:
(a) Trauma;
(b) The loss of breast tissue due to
congenital or noncongenital diseases; or
(c) A mastectomy; or
(ii) For prophylaxis against a future disease of the
breast.
(B) "Breast reconstruction surgery" includes without
limitation:
(i) Augmentation, reduction, and mastectomy and all
procedures for a contralateral breast necessary for symmetry;
(ii) All breast reconstruction modalities, including
without limitation implant-based breast reconstruction, tissue-based breast
reconstruction, and any breast reconstruction modalities that are developed
subsequent to the effective date of this act that are recognized within Level
I of the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System codes and are determined
by rule of the Insurance Commissioner to qualify under this subchapter;
(iii) All types of breast reconstruction contained
within the modalities under subdivision (2)(B)(ii) of this section, including
without limitation:
(a) Immediate implant-based breast
reconstruction;
(b) Delayed implant-based breast
reconstruction;
03-19-2025 14:21:43 ANS056

As Engrossed: S3/4/25 S3/19/25 SB83
(c) Myocutaneous flap tissue-based breast
reconstruction;
(d) Microvascular free flap tissue-based
breast reconstruction;
(e) Structural fat grafting tissue-based
breast reconstruction;
(f) Combined implant-based and tissue-based
breast reconstruction; and
(g) Any type of breast reconstruction that is
developed subsequent to the effective date of this act that is recognized
within Level I of the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System codes and is
determined by rule of the commissioner to qualify under this subchapter;
(iv) All procedural variations, iterations, or
approaches associated with the breast reconstruction types under subdivision
(2)(B)(iii) of this section, as noted within the short descriptor or the
description for the Level I Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System code
covering the modalities and types of breast reconstruction;
(v) Chest wall reconstruction, including without
limitation an aesthetic flat closure;
(vi) Custom fabricated breast prostheses, including
without limitation replacement of such breast prostheses; and
(vii) Coverage for the mechanical, medical, and
surgical treatment of physical complications of a mastectomy, breast
reconstruction surgery, chest wall reconstruction, radiation, and lymph node
surgery;
(3) "Enrollee" means an individual entitled to coverage of
healthcare services from a healthcare insurer;
(4) "Facility reimbursement rate" means the amount paid to a
healthcare facility by a healthcare insurer for certain procedures and
includes the costs of healthcare services;
(5)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan, policy,
or contract for healthcare services issued, renewed, or extended in this
state by a healthcare insurer, health maintenance organization, hospital
medical service corporation, or self-insured governmental or church plan in
this state; and
03-19-2025 14:21:43 ANS056

As Engrossed: S3/4/25 S3/19/25 SB83
(ii) Any health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program
established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-
61-1001 et seq.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Plans providing health benefits to state and
public school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) Medical payments under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan other than a cancer
insurance plan or cancer supplemental policy; or
(x) A long-term-care-only plan;
(6) "Healthcare facility" means:
(A) An ambulatory surgery center;
(B) A hospital; or
(C) An outpatient surgery center;
(7)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means any insurance company,
hospital and medical service corporation, health maintenance organization, or
a nonprofit agricultural membership organization as defined under § 23-60-104
that issues or delivers health benefit plans in this state.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
03-19-2025 14:21:43 ANS056

As Engrossed: S3/4/25 S3/19/25 SB83
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
(8) "Healthcare professional" means a person who is licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized by the laws of this state to administer
health care in the ordinary course of the practice of his or her profession;
(9) "Healthcare professional reimbursement rate" means the
amount paid to a healthcare professional by a healthcare insurer for
procedures and includes the costs of healthcare services;
(10) "Healthcare service" means an item or service provided to
an individual for the purposes of alleviating, curing, healing, or preventing
human illness, injury, or physical disability;
(11) "Hospital" means a facility licensed as a hospital by the
Division of Health Facility Services under § 20-9-213;
(12) "Mastectomy" means the removal of all or part of the breast
for medically necessary reasons as determined by a healthcare professional;
(13) "Out-of-network provider" means a healthcare professional
that provides healthcare services to an enrollee but is not a participating
provider;
(14)(A) "Outpatient surgery center" means a facility in which
surgical services are offered that require the use of general or intravenous
anesthetics, and where, in the opinion of the attending physician,
hospitalization, as defined in the present licensure law, is not necessary.
(B) "Outpatient surgery center" does not include:
(i) A medical office owned and operated by a
physician or more than one (1) physician licensed by the Arkansas State
Medical Board, if the medical office does not bill a facility fee to a third-
party payor; or
(ii) A dental office that has a Moderate Sedation
Facility Permit or a Deep Sedation-General Anesthesia Facility Permit issued
by the Arkansas State Board of Dental Examiners; and
(15) "Participating provider" means a healthcare professional
that has a healthcare contract with a contracting entity to provide
healthcare services to an enrollee with the expectation of receiving payment
either directly from the contracting entity or from a healthcare insurer
affiliated with the contracting entity.

23-79-2902. Coverage for breast reconstruction surgery.
03-19-2025 14:21:43 ANS056

As Engrossed: S3/4/25 S3/19/25 SB83
(a) On and after January 1, 2026, a health benefit plan that is
offered, issued, or renewed in this state shall provide coverage for all
modalities, types, and techniques of a healthcare service provided for a
breast reconstruction surgery and shall cover any surgery determined as the
best course of treatment by a healthcare professional, consistent with
prevailing medical standards, and in consultation with the patient.
(b) The coverage for breast reconstruction surgery under this section:
(1) Shall be subject to policy deductibles, copayment
requirements, or coinsurance requirements of a healthcare insurer at a cost
that is no more than those costs associated with the health benefit plan's
in-network rate for the healthcare service;
(2) Does not diminish or limit benefits otherwise allowable
under a health benefit plan; and
(3) Shall not affect an enrollee's eligibility or continued
eligibility to enroll or renew coverage under the terms of the health benefit
plan solely for the purpose of avoiding the requirements of this subchapter.
(c) If an enrollee is forced to use an out-of-network provider due to
a healthcare insurer's network inadequacy, the enrollee's financial
responsibility shall remain at an in-network rate.

23-79-2903. Prior authorization required for breast reconstruction
surgery — Single case agreements.
(a) A healthcare insurer shall require prior authorization for breast
reconstruction surgery.
(b) If a healthcare insurer does not have a participating provider who
provides a breast reconstruction surgery that has been determined as the best
course of treatment by a healthcare professional and is consistent with
prevailing medical standards and in consultation with the patient, then the
healthcare insurer that provides a prior authorization or predetermination of
the healthcare service shall automatically approve a single case agreement at
the same rate as specified under § 23-79-2904(a).

23-79-2904. Reimbursement rate — Penalties for late payment or
nonpayment.
(a) If a healthcare insurer does not have a participating provider who
provides a breast reconstruction surgery that has been determined as the best
03-19-2025 14:21:43 ANS056

As Engrossed: S3/4/25 S3/19/25 SB83
course of treatment by a healthcare professional and is consistent with
prevailing medical standards and in consultation with the patient, then the
healthcare insurer shall reimburse the out-of-network provider who performs
the breast reconstruction surgery at an amount that is the lesser of:
(1) The healthcare professional's billed charges for the
healthcare services; or
(2) The eightieth percentile of all charges for the particular
healthcare service performed by a healthcare professional in the same or
similar specialty and provided in the same or similar geographical area as
reported in a benchmarking database that is maintained by a nonprofit
organization if that nonprofit organization is not affiliated with,
financially supported by, or otherwise supported by a healthcare insurer.
(b) A healthcare insurer shall provide a fair and reasonable facility
reimbursement rate for healthcare services performed by a healthcare
professional in a healthcare facility under this subchapter.
(c)(1) In the case of a healthcare insurer that does not reimburse an
out-of-network provider or a healthcare facility as required under this
section, the healthcare insurer, in addition to making the required payment
for the healthcare services, shall pay the out-of-network provider or
healthcare facility an amount that is three (3) times the difference between:
(A) The initial payment, or in the case of a notice of
denial of payment, zero dollars ($0.00); and
(B) The out-of-network reimbursement rate required under
this section, less any cost-sharing required to be paid by the enrollee.
(2) The payment that is required under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section is subject to interest in a manner specified by the Insurance
Commissioner by rule.

23-79-2905. Coverage eligibility.
A healthcare insurer providing benefits under this subchapter shall not
deny an enrollee eligibility or continued eligibility to enroll or renew
coverage under the terms of the health benefit plan solely for the purpose of
avoiding the requirements of this subchapter.

23-79-2906. Waiver prohibited.
(a) The provisions of this subchapter shall not be waived by contract.
03-19-2025 14:21:43 ANS056

As Engrossed: S3/4/25 S3/19/25 SB83
(b) A contractual arrangement or action taken in conflict with this
subchapter or that purport to waive any requirement of this subchapter is
void.
(c) This subchapter shall not be used by a healthcare insurer to lower
reimbursement rates for other healthcare services involving breast
reconstruction provided by a participating provider.

23-79-2907. Rules.
(a) The Insurance Commissioner shall develop and promulgate rules for
the implementation and administration of this subchapter.
(b) The State Board of Finance shall develop and promulgate rules for
the administration of this subchapter for the plans providing health benefits
to state and public school employees under § 21-5-401 et seq.

/s/J. Bryant





















03-19-2025 14:21:43 ANS056